Hawaii statutes.
§199-5 Summons or citation. There
shall be a form of summons or citation for use in citing violators of title 12,
chapters 6D, 6E, and 6K, and rules adopted thereunder, which do not mandate the
physical arrest of the violators. The summons or citation shall be printed in
a form commensurate with the form of other summons or citation used in modern
methods of arrest and shall be so designed to include all necessary information
to make it valid and legal within the laws and rules of the State. The form and
content of the summons or citation shall be adopted or prescribed by the
district courts.

In every case where a summons or citation is
issued, the original of the same shall be given to the violator; provided that
the district courts may prescribe the issuance to the violator of a carbon copy
of the summons or citation and provide for the disposition of the original and
any other copies. Every summons or citation shall be consecutively numbered
and each carbon copy shall bear the number of its respective original. [L 1978,
c 171, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 85, §113; am L 1997, c 17, §2; am L 2004, c 142,
§12]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next